Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1351
Treated seed; use prohibited; when.

The use of seed that is treated, as defined in section 81-2,147.01, in the production of agricultural ethyl alcohol shall be prohibited if such use results in the generation of a byproduct that is deemed unsafe for livestock consumption or land application.

Laws 2021, LB507, § 8.